Illinois, session 104th, HB3427.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Insurance Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 61405-55 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1405/1405-55 new)8    Sec. 1405-55. Public Adjuster Advisory Board.9    (a) The Public Adjuster Advisory Board is created within 10the Department of Insurance. The Board shall review and 11recommend changes to the licensure, license issuance, and 12requirements for licensed public adjusters in this State. The 13Board shall also adopt advisory recommendations, which may 14include proposed rules, for consideration by the Department as 15necessary to protect commercial and residential consumers in 16situations where a catastrophic event has taken place.17    (b) The Board shall consist of the following members:18        (1) the Director of Insurance or the Director's 19    designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the Board;20        (2) the Chief Enforcement Officer of the Department of 21    Insurance or the Chief Enforcement Officer's designee;22        (3) the General Counsel of the Department of Insurance 23    or the General Counsel's designee;  HB3427- 2 -LRB104 10633 SPS 20710 b1        (4) one member appointed by the President of the 2    Senate;3        (5) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 4    Senate;5        (6) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 6    of Representatives;7        (7) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 8    House of Representatives;9        (8) one licensed attorney who specializes in the 10    regulation of public adjusters in Illinois, appointed the 11    Governor; 12        (9) one public adjuster residing outside of Cook 13    County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake County, McHenry 14    County, and Will County, appointed the Governor;15        (10) 2 licensed public adjusters residing in Cook 16    County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake County, McHenry 17    County, and Will County, appointed the Governor; and18        (11) 2 licensed public adjusters representing the 19    Chicagoland Public Adjusters Association, appointed the 20    Governor.21    (c) Members shall receive no compensation, but they may be 22reimbursed for necessary expenses from appropriations to the 23Department of Insurance available for that purpose.24    (d) The Department of Insurance shall provide staff and 25administrative assistance to the Board. 26    (e) The Board shall meet as soon as practicable after the   HB3427- 3 -LRB104 10633 SPS 20710 b1appointments are made to the Board. The Board shall meet in 2April and September of each year thereafter. 3    (f) No later than January 1, 2026, and each year 4thereafter, the Board shall submit a report to the Governor 5and the General Assembly concerning any issues relating to the 6licensing and operations of public adjusters in this State and 7any recommend policy changes to address those issues. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.